Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

Law reviews:

For article, "2019

C

olorado Business Law Updates: Revising the

C

olorado Business Corporation Act and the Colorado Corporations and Associations Act", see 48 Colo. Law. 26 (Nov. 2019).

7-114-301. Grounds for judicial dissolution.

A corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by the attorney general if it is established that:

The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud; or

The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law.

A corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by a shareholder if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered, or the business and affairs of the corporation can no longer be conducted to the advantage of the shareholders generally, because of the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent;

The shareholders are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election of their successors;

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The corporation has abandoned its business and has failed within a reasonable time to liquidate and distribute its assets and dissolve.

A corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

The creditor's claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied, and the corporation is insolvent; or

The corporation is insolvent and the corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor's claim is due and owing.

If a corporation has been dissolved by voluntary action taken under part 1 of this article 114:

The corporation may bring a proceeding to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-114-302; and

The attorney general, a shareholder, or a creditor, as the case may be, may bring a proceeding to wind up and liquidate the business and affairs of the corporation under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-114-302, upon establishing the grounds set forth for that person, respectively, in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

As used in sections 7-114-302 to 7-114-304, a "proceeding to dissolve a corporation" includes a proceeding brought under this subsection (4), and a "decree of dissolution" includes an order of court entered in a proceeding under this subsection (4) which directs that the business and affairs of a corporation shall be wound up and liquidated under judicial supervision.

Subsections (2)(a) to (2)(e) of this section do not apply in the case of a corporation that, on the date of the filing of the proceeding, has a class or series of shares that is:

A covered security under section 18 (b)(1)(A) or 18 (b)(1)(B) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", 15 U.S.C. sec. 77r (b)(1)(A) and 77r (b)(1)(B);

Not a covered security but is traded in an organized market and has a market value of at least twenty million dollars, exclusive of the value of the shares held by the corporation's subsidiaries, senior executives, directors, and persons known to the corporation owning more than ten percent of the shares; or

Issued by an open-end management investment company registered with the federal securities and exchange commission under the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940", 15 U.S.C. sec. 80a-1 et seq., and that may be redeemed at the option of the holder at net asset value.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 830, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1508, § 284, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(4)(a) amended, p. 1219, § 29, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(c), (2)(d), and (4)(e) amended and (2)(e) and (5) added, (SB 19-86), ch. 166, p. 1960, § 57, effective July 1, 2020.

7-114-302. Procedure for judicial dissolution.

A proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a corporation shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the corporation's principal office or the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the corporation has no principal office in this state and no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver. A proceeding brought by any other party named in section 7-114-301 shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the corporation's principal office is located or, if it has no principal office in this state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the corporation has no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

It is not necessary to make shareholders parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

Within ten days after the commencement of a proceeding to dissolve a corporation under section 7-114-301 (2), the corporation shall send to all shareholders, other than the petitioner, a notice stating that the shareholders are entitled to avoid the dissolution of the corporation by electing to purchase the petitioner's shares under section 7-114-305 and accompanied by a copy of section 7-114-305.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 831, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1326, § 42, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2330, § 269, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1961, § 58, effective July 1, 2020.

7-114-303. Receivership or custodianship.

Unless an election to purchase has been filed under section 7-114-305, a court in a judicial proceeding to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the business and affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after giving notice to all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property, wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual, a domestic entity, or a foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver:

May dispose of all or any part of the property of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

May sue and defend in the receiver's own name as receiver of the corporation in all courts; or

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its shareholders and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation and its shareholders and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and such person's counsel from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 832, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2330, § 270, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1508, § 285, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1962, § 59, effective July 1, 2020.

7-114-304. Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in section 7-114-301 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and stating the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation's business and affairs in accordance with section 7-114-105 and the giving of notice to claimants in accordance with sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

The court's order or decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 833, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 2330, § 271, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1508, § 286, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 881, § 76, effective July 1.

7-114-305. Election to purchase in lieu of dissolution.

In a proceeding under section 7-114-301 (2) to dissolve a corporation, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, the corporation may elect or, if it fails to elect, one or more shareholders may elect, to purchase all shares owned by the petitioning shareholder at the fair value of the shares. An election pursuant to this section is irrevocable unless the court determines that it is equitable to set aside or modify the election.

An election to purchase pursuant to this section may be filed with the court at any time within ninety days after the filing of the petition under section 7-114-301 (2) or at such later time as the court in its discretion may allow. If the election to purchase is filed by one or more shareholders, the corporation shall, within ten days after the filing, give notice to all shareholders other than the petitioner. The notice must state the name and number of shares owned by the petitioner and the name and number of shares owned by each electing shareholder and must advise the recipients of their right to join in the election to purchase shares in accordance with this section.

Shareholders that wish to participate must file notice of their intention to join in the purchase no later than thirty days after the effective date of the notice to them. All shareholders who have filed an election or notice of their intention to participate in the election to purchase become parties to the proceeding and participate in the purchase in proportion to their ownership of shares as of the date the first election was filed unless they otherwise agree or the court otherwise directs.

After an election has been filed by the corporation or one or more shareholders, the proceeding under section 7-114-302 (2) may not be discontinued or settled, nor may the petitioning shareholder sell or otherwise dispose of the shareholder's shares, unless the court determines that it would be equitable to the corporation and the shareholders, other than the petitioner, to permit the discontinuance, settlement, sale, or other disposition.

If, within sixty days after the filing of the first election, the parties reach agreement as to the fair value and terms of purchase of the petitioner's shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase of the petitioner's shares upon the terms and conditions agreed to by the parties.

If the parties are unable to reach an agreement as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, the court, upon application of any party, shall stay the proceedings held pursuant to section 7-114-302 and determine the fair value of the petitioner's shares as of the day before the date on which the petition under section 7-114-302 was filed or as of such other date as the court deems appropriate under the circumstances.

Upon determining the fair value of the shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase upon such terms and conditions as the court deems appropriate, which may include payment of the purchase price in installments where necessary in the interests of equity, provision for security to assure payment of the purchase price and any additional expenses as may have been awarded, and, if the shares are to be purchased by shareholders, the allocation of shares among the shareholders. In allocating the petitioner's shares among holders of different classes of shares, the court shall attempt to preserve the existing distribution of voting rights among holders of different classes insofar as practicable and may direct that holders of a specific class or classes not participate in the purchase.

Interest may be allowed at the rate and from the date determined by the court to be equitable, but if the court finds that the refusal of the petitioning shareholder to accept an offer of payment was arbitrary or otherwise not in good faith, no interest shall be allowed.

If the court finds that the petitioning shareholder had probable grounds for relief under section 7-114-301 (2)(b) or (2)(d), it may award expenses to the petitioning shareholder.

Upon entry of an order under subsection (3) or (5) of this section, the court shall dismiss the petition to dissolve the corporation under section 7-114-302 and the petitioning shareholder no longer has any rights or status as a shareholder of the corporation other than the right to receive the amounts awarded by the order of the court, which is enforceable in the same manner as any other judgment.

The purchase ordered pursuant to subsection (5) of this section must be made within ten days after the date the order becomes final unless, before that time, the corporation files with the court a notice of its intention to adopt articles of dissolution pursuant to sections 7-114-102 and 7-114-103, which articles must then be adopted and filed within fifty days after the filing of the notice. Upon filing of the articles of dissolution, the corporation is dissolved in accordance with sections 7-90-910 to 7-90-914 and the order entered pursuant to subsection (5) of this section is no longer of any force or effect; except that the court may award the petitioning shareholder expenses in accordance with subsection (5)(c) of this section and the petitioner may continue to pursue any claims previously asserted on behalf of the corporation.

Any payment by the corporation pursuant to an order under subsection (3) or (5) of this section, other than an award of expenses pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, is subject to section 7-106-401.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1962, § 60, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 171, § 28, effective April 19.